District of Columbia statutes.
3-1210.04

Filing false document or evidence; false statements.

(a)

No person shall file or attempt to file with any board or the Mayor any statement, diploma, certificate, credential, or other evidence if the person knows, or should know, that it is false or misleading.

(b)

No person shall knowingly make a false statement that is in fact material under oath or affirmation administered by any board or hearing officer.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 1004, 33 DCR 729
1981 Ed., § 2-3310.4.